Washington statutes.
RCW 19.305.110

Local conflicts or preemption prohibited.

The local governmental units of this state may neither enact nor enforce any ordinance or other local law or regulation conflicting with, or preempted by, any provision of this chapter or with any policy of this state expressed by this chapter, whether that policy is expressed by inclusion of a provision in this chapter or by exclusion of that subject from this chapter.

[ 2008 c 239 s 12.]